Illinois, session 104th, HB5813.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5changing Section 9-209 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/9-209)  (from Ch. 110, par. 9-209)7    Sec. 9-209. Demand for rent - eviction action. 8    (a) A landlord or his or her agent may, any time after rent 9is due, demand payment thereof and notify the tenant, in 10writing, that unless payment is made within a time mentioned 11in such notice, not less than 5 days after service thereof, the 12lease will be terminated and an eviction or ejectment action 13shall be commenced. If the tenant does not pay the rent due 14within the time stated in the notice under this Section, the 15landlord may consider the lease ended and commence an eviction 16or ejectment action without further notice or demand. A claim 17for rent may be joined in the complaint, including a request 18for the pro rata amount of rent due for any period that a 19judgment is stayed, and a judgment obtained for the amount of 20rent found due, in any action or proceeding brought, in an 21eviction action under this Section.22    Notice made pursuant to this Section shall, as hereinafter 23stated, not be invalidated by payments of past due rent   HB5813- 2 -LRB104 22487 LNS 38932 b1demanded in the notice, when the payments do not, at the end of 2the notice period, total the amount demanded in the notice. 3The landlord may, however, agree in writing to continue the 4lease in exchange for receiving partial payment. To prevent 5invalidation, the notice must prominently state:6    "Only FULL PAYMENT of the rent demanded in this notice 7will waive the landlord's right to terminate the lease under 8this notice, unless the landlord agrees in writing to continue 9the lease in exchange for receiving partial payment."10    Collection by the landlord of past rent due after the 11filing of a suit for eviction or ejectment pursuant to failure 12of the tenant to pay the rent demanded in the notice shall not 13invalidate the suit.14    (b) If the tenant fails to pay rent within the time stated 15in the notice under subsection (a) and the landlord commences 16an eviction or ejectment action, the summons and complaint for 17the action shall be served on the tenant within 5 business days 18after the landlord commences the action. The tenant must file 19an appearance within 5 business days of receiving the summons 20and complaint. The court shall hold the hearing on the 21eviction or ejectment action within 10 business days of the 22tenant filing an appearance, or, if the tenant fails to file an 23appearance, within 10 business days of the date on which the 24tenant was required to file an appearance. If a judgment is 25entered in favor of the landlord, the judgment shall be served 26on the tenant within 5 business days of the entry of the   HB5813- 3 -LRB104 22487 LNS 38932 b1judgment. Possession of the premises shall be restored to the 2landlord immediately following the service of the judgment. 3(Source: P.A. 100-173, eff. 1-1-18.)